Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3624
Severability; construction.

(a) The provisions of the Interstate Medical Licensure Compact shall be severable, and if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision is deemed unenforceable, the remaining provisions of the compact shall be enforceable.

(b) The provisions of the compact shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

(c) Nothing in the compact shall be construed to prohibit the applicability of other interstate compacts to which the states are members.

Laws 2017, LB88, § 24.